src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexd
LEXICON Class_II
ab'
ab'aj
ab'aq
ab'aqhu
ab'aal
ab'en
ab'ib'aal
ab'ihom
ab'inel
ab'ine'leb'
ab'ihom
Achi
ach'ab'alhu
aj
ajaw
ajb'il
ajl
ajlanel
ajleb'aal
ajleb'ilha'
ajlil
ajlilkomontoj
ajlilk'uultumin
ajom
ajsinel
ajsi'baalb'ich
ajsiil
Akateko
akoost
ak'ach
ak'aatin
ak'chahim
alab'metz'ew
alab'tesib'aal
alalch'iich'
alb'aak
alkohol
alk'uula'al
almeentr
almul
alob'aal
alpek'iich'
alfoombr
amapool
amaq'
amaq'il
amb'ulaans
amiiw
amiiwil
amoch
anaqwankil'uxk
anis
anjel
anum
anumal
anumtesinel
anx
anyooj
apoostl
apusinel
apuul
aq
aq'
araaw
arb'eej
arko
arkute'
aros
aroow
arsob'iisp
artal
asam
asapran
asaron
aselk
asetuun
aseet
aspiriin
astz'iib'
asuseen
asuukr
ataw
atawalant
ateey
atib'aal
atiyach'
atz'am
atz'um
awab'ej
awab'ejihom
awab'ejil
awab'ejilal
awas
awasinel
awimq
awinel
awleb'
awleb'aal
awril
ayin
a'
aakan
aalal
aalom
aalenel
aam
aanilanel
aanilxaab'
aapy
aaq
aaqam
aaqha'
aatik'uul
aatin
ib'
aatinanel
aatinanel
aatinel
aatinob'aal
aatinom
b'a
b'ach
b'ach'b'il
b'ach'al
b'ach'om
b'ajlaq
b'akuun
b'alamq'e
b'alaq'
b'alk
b'alq'hu
b'alxuk
b'an
b'ane'k
b'anha'
b'anleb'aal
b'anol
b'anonel
b'anpim
b'antz'ipxul
b'anxxulelyajel
b'anyoxinkil
b'aq
b'aqch'iich'
b'aqel
b'aqsotz'
b'aq'al
b'aral
b'arxab'on
b'aswajb'
b'ateriiy
b'atxaqam
b'atz'
aq'
b'atz'iil
b'atz'unel
b'atz'uneleb'
b'atz'unleb'aal
b'atz'uul
b'axton
b'ayeen
b'ayjik
b'ayom
b'aak
b'aalam
b'aanunel
b'aark
b'aas
b'aatal
b'e
B'e
b'ehil
b'ehul
b'eleb'aal
b'eleb'poyanam
b'eleexuk
b'elo
b'eneen
b'entaan
b'esleb'aal
b'esonel
b'estiiy
b'eeche'
b'eehenel
b'eel
b'een
b'eenik
b'eeresinel
b'eetak'aak'alenel
b'eetaql
b'eexam
b'ich
b'ichanel
b'ichleb'
b'ihomal
b'inaayr
b'iqb'ilb'an
b'ir
b'irich
b'irk
b'irleb'aal
b'ironel
b'isb'ametz'ew
b'isikleet
b'isketiiq
b'isleb'
b'isleb'tiq
b'isxuk
b'it'b'it'leb'aal
b'itzkiri'
b'iin
b'iis
b'iismetz'ew
b'iis'aal
b'o
b'ob'
b'oj
b'ojleb'
b'ojleb'aal
b'ojom
b'ojonel
b'ol
b'olb'o
b'olol
b'olsutaal'eek'
b'omb'iiy
b'on
b'onkik'
b'onleb'
b'onol
b'ononel
b'onxaab'
b'oqleb'
b'oqleb'aal
b'oqom
b'oq'leb'ch'iich'
b'oreeg
b'orleb'
b'ot
b'otb'an
b'otleb'
b'otwa
b'otonx
b'otz'leb'
b'ook
b'ookatq
b'ookha'
b'ookhumha'
b'ookilxaml
b'ookol
b'oolam
b'ools
b'oom
b'oot
b'oox
b'ooyx
b'rookl
b'ub'
b'uch
b'uj
b'ukleb'aal
b'uqux
b'uq'ultzimitz
b'ut'b'iltib'
b'ut'leb'
b'utzchahim
b'ux
b'uuleb'
b'uulik
b'uur
b'uuy
b'yers
cha
chachib'
chahim
chahimpek
chahim'eetalil
chaj
chajal
chakach
chakalte'
chakeet
chakmut
chakow
chakti'
chak'b'olay
chak'oq
Chalchitan
chalik
chamal
chamalnawom
champa
champan
chankilal
chapb'il
chapleb'
chaponel
chapteeleb'
chaqi'eel
chaqi'oqil
chaq'al
chaq'aliltz'iib'
chaq'om
chaq'rab'
chaq'rab'il
cha'alil
cha'jleb'aal
chaab'
chaab'iltz'iib'
chaab'ilob'resink
Chaak
chaak'aanil
chaalel
che'
che'el
che'k'aam
che'pix
che'sib'ik
che'wajb'
cheekelal
cheet
chib'aat
chihab'
chikiriin
chikleb'
chili'
chimam
chinamiit
chiqleb'
chiqleb'aal
chiq'ch'ool
chirleb'
chiron
chi'resinel
chiin
chocho'
chochtz'iib'
choq
choqtin
choriis
choxach'och'
choxahilb'eeleb'
choy
cho'b'ol
cho'hix
cho'k'oj
cho'ok
Chuj
chumay
chun
chunak
chunilb'an
chunleb'aal
chunt'ikr
chuntz'iib'l
chupil
chuq'ub'
chut
chu'
chuub'
ch'ajleb'
ch'ajom
ch'ajomal
ch'amb'ul
ch'antun
ch'a'ajkilal
ch'aat
ch'ejej
ch'elel
ch'emna'yu'am
ch'en
ch'ere'wajb'
ch'ich'i'il
ch'ikb'ilb'an
ib'
ch'ima
ch'imb'
ch'inal
usal
ch'inaaljuch'
ch'inkumb'
ch'inq'ejuch
ch'int'ojiil
ch'iqil
ch'iqok
ch'iqo'k
ch'iwan
ch'i'
ch'i'ch'i'
ch'i'kay
ch'iich'
ch'iich'ul
ch'iil
ch'o
ch'och'
ch'ohib'aal
ch'ohix
ch'ol
ch'oolejil
ch'olk'anjel
ch'olk'anjelob'aal
ch'olna'leb'
ch'olob'anel
ch'olob'ankil
ch'olob'ihom
ch'olq'e
ch'oltul
ch'oltz'iib'
ch'olwinq
ch'onpatz
ch'op
ch'oqom
ch'oreq
Ch'orti'
ch'otlepon
ch'otolal
ch'otonik
ch'oolanink
ch'oolil
xch'oolil
ch'oolmetz'ew
ch'oolyaab'
ch'ub'
ch'uch'
ch'uch'ib'leb'aal
ch'um
ch'ut
ch'uttenq'
ch'utub'ank
ch'utub'eetalil
ch'ux
ch'uylal
ch'uyul
ch'uut
ch'uutal
ch'uutam
ch'uutamil
ch'uutleb'aal
ch'uutulal
e
aatin
echkab'al
ech'ajaat
ela'
eleb'
elektrisidad
elepaant
elkleb'aal
elq'
elik
emel
eneer
eq'laaho'k
eq'laak
ermiit
esil
esilal
esilalil
esilhu
esilk'anjel
esilnawom
eskaleer
espinaak
estasion
estuuf
eswaayr
eeb'
eechaninb'il
eechej
eechej
eek'
eek'ahom
eek'aal
eek'ch'iich'
eek'ob'aal
eeqaj
eeqajil
eeqajsachomj
eetal
eetalb'irool
eetalhu
eetalil
eetalilatq
eetalilul
eetalkamenaq
eetalkawyaab'
eetalmu
eetalnum'iq
ajl
eetaltaql
eetaltz'iib'
eetaal
eetil
eetz'aal
eheb'
evangelio
hab'ilhu
hal
halaw
hay
ha'
ha'il
ha'ilyol
ha'resinel
Haab
helo
heelam
hilaal
hilob'aal
hilob'jukub'
hiltasib'aalch'iich'
hiltesinel
hitb'arch'iich'
hix
hixch'iich'
hiil
homch'iich'
hompaq'
homtol'iq'
honon
hopleb'
hopleb'che'
hopleb'tz'ak
hopleb'hu
hopolal
hoyal
hoyb'
ho'meet
hoonal
hoonalhilaal
hoonalil
hu
hupatz'om
huhil
huhilkub'ha'
loq'om
huhiltumin
humal
huraqb'atzolok
hutojxoyiil
hutz'aam
hux
huxaqalil
ib'oy
ich'
ich'leb'ch'iich'
ich'mulb'an
iglees
ik
iklees
iko
ik'b'olay
ik'ek'
ik'oy
ilb'ahoonal
ilb'a'ixlem
ileb'
ileb'aalmu
ilob'aal
ilom
ilonel
imul
Inklateer
Inkles
inseekt
internet
inup
iq'
iq'ob'aal
iq'xaml
is
isb'
isk'i'ij
ismal
iswa
it
Itzamna
Itza'
iwaan
ixajaw
ixim
ixi'ij
ixi'jeb'
ixkej
Ixkik
ixq
ixqa'al
ixqilal
iyaj
iyajib'aal
iyajiil
iiq
iiqanel
iiqaal
iiqom
iitz'intz'iib'
jachal
jachkab'al
jachleb'
jachsirso
Jakalteka
jalajik
uuchib'aal
uuchinel
jalam'uuch
jalam'uuchleb'
jalam'uuleb'
jalb'ametz'ew
jalb'e
jalleb'aal
ib'
jalonel
jaltesink
jamon
jaqleb'
jaq'b'ab'
jaq'ilb'an
jarjek'il
jasmin
jayal
jayalihom
jayaab'wajb'
jayiltz'uumal'u
jayil'isb'
ja'ajul
ja'leb'aal
jeb'ib'aal
ajl
uhil
jech'xuk
jekb'ametz'ew
jek'inel
jek'iil
jek'muriil
jek'pojk'ok
jerink
ji
jiq'
jisleb'
jit
jitb'il
jitom
jitonel
jit'aal
jit'iil
jit'leb'
jitz'jitz'
ji'leb'
jiileb'
job'nil
job'wajb'
jochleb'
jochol
jochom
jochonel
joj
jokleb'
jok'
jolom
jolomb'ej
jolomil
jolomilal
jolominel
jolomnib'aal
jolool
jomal
jonjoli
jorb'ana'leb'
jorinkleb'
jorleb'pek
josq'il
jotz
jotzleb'
jo'kanil
joob'
joob'aq
jookleb'
jook'
jooleb'
joom
joomuk'al
joor
juch'
juch'leb'
juch'unel
jukub'
jukub'iiq
jukxul
jul
julel
juliis
julpek
jultikahom
jultikahonel
jultikaal
jultikleb'
jultik'anjel
jumha'elch'iich'
junajch'oolej
junajeetalb'irok
junajihom
junajil
junajroqil
junaqil
junaqlil
junesal
junesalil
junesal'uxk
juneetilk'ab'a'
juneetil'aatin
junil
junkab'al
junlajuxuk
junpak'alpalaw
junpaatil'esil
junqalil
junqmayil
juntaq'eetil
juntaq'eetyaalalil
juntaalil
junxaqal
junxaqalil
jurameent
juruch'
jurxaab'
jusk'aam
jutzutzu
jutz'b'ojleb'
jutz'che'
jutz'ch'iich'
eetalil
jutz'kutleb'
jutz'leb'
juul
juun
juutz'
jweews
kab'
kab'yo'lajik
kachiimp
kach'in
kakaw
kalajel
kalawx
kala'
kalha'
kalon
kameey
kamiis
kamna'aj
kampameent
kampaan
kamsib'aal
kamsinel
ib'
kamsiik
kamsiil
kamyon
kamyoneet
kanab'om
kanaleet
kaneel
kanhub'aal
kanser
kantaaw
kanteel
kape
kapiiy
kapoteer
kaqal
kaqcha
Kaqchahim
Kaqchikel
kaqitul
kaqkik'
kaqkoj
kaqlak
kaqlamj
kaqpech'in
kaqxe'
kaqxot'ink
kaqyajel
kar
karayool
karetiiy
kareton
kareen
kareet
Karifuna
karkamoon
karneer
karton
karwans
kas
Kastiiy
katoolk
katz
katzkatz
kawaay
kawb'aqel
kawilal
kawresil
kawub'l
kawub'lb'an
kawyehink
kaxajl
kaxb'olol
kaxchaj
kaxchampa
kaxche'kenq'
kaxchixl
kaxch'aat
kaxch'i'kay
kaxemel
kaxjoom
kaxjukin
kaxjukub'
kaxkatras
kaxkukay
kaxk'oyem
kaxlan
Kaxlanchi'
kaxlanha'
kaxlankaq'
kaxlank'uluj
kaxlanq'ib'
kaxlanxaml
kaxmetz'ew
kaxmis
kaxmu
kaxmuheb'aal
kaxmu'eetalil
kaxon
kaxpo'ot
kaxq'ooq'
kaxsaqenk
kaxsoq'
kaxsu
kaxsuk
kaxtzukxul
kaxtzuychampa
kaxukutinb'il
kaxukuutinb'ilhu
kaxuk'a'
kaxwakax
kaxxul
kax'isk'i'ij
kax'olb'
ka'
ka'awb'il
ka'ch'olob'ank
ka'eetalb'irok
ka'ib'
ka'kab'iluxk
ka'lach'
ka'muluq'utiltz'uq
ka'na'jilxul
ka'sutink
ka'suut
ka't'oj
ka'tz'uq
ka'wahink
ka'xaqab'aal
ka'xik
ka'yab'aal
kaajachal
kaalt
kaanch
kaanilb'an
kaans
kaat
kaax
kaaxt
kaaxukuutleb'
kaayehiil
kehob'resib'aal
keho'ktib'elej
Kej
kej
kelam
kelk'arch'iich'
kelonel
kem
kemleb'
kenq'
ketomq
ketzal
ke'b'ab'aal
ke'leb'
ke'leb'aal
ke'nel
keeleb'aal
kees
kik'che'
kik'xe'
kira'sleb'
kis
kitaar
ki'al
ki'b'ach
ki'tuux
kiil
klaawx
kojl
kojoj
kok
kokakool
kokech
kokxul
kok'al
kok'alil
kok'anjel
kok'awinq
kok'cha'al
kok'k'aleb'aal
kok'k'um
kolb'ach'ool
kolb'ajolom
kolb'a'ich'mulej
koliplor
kolom
kolol
kolom
kolten
kolonel
komon
komontenq'
komontoj
komonil
komonilk'anjel
komonilwank
konb'eent
konxik'
kopmokooch
koral
korb'aat
kormaach
koroon
kordel
kordeer
kostiiy
kotko
kotoxch'iich'
kottzuj
koxtal
koyow
kook
kookox
kootal
kranaa
kranyon
kristyaan
krus
kub'eet
kub'iha'
kub'sa'
kub'siil
kuchaar
kuk
kukb'
Kukulkan
kulantr
kulb'ch'iich'
kulb't'ojom
kuluk
kumb'
kumb'i'uk'al
kumum
kun
kunutz'
kupch'iich'
kupub'ank
kupub'ank
kuriit
kutan
Kutan
kutankil
kutleb'
kutleb'mu
kutum
kuxil
kuy
kuuk
kuukb'eleb'ch'iich'
kuukch'iich'
kuult
kuut
kuutiil
kuux
kwaart
kweent
k'ab'
k'ab'a'
k'ab'a'na'jej
k'ahal
k'ahamch'iich'
k'aj
k'ajk'asal
k'ajob'
k'ajol
k'ajyaab'aatin
k'al
k'aleb'aal
k'alom
k'alomal
k'amb'olay
k'amch'ool
k'amch'oolanink
k'amleb'aal
k'amok
k'amom
k'ams
k'anjel
k'anjelob'aal
k'anti'
k'aq
k'as
k'asal
k'asib'k
k'atk'al
k'atolch'iich'
k'atom
k'atzleb'
k'awil
k'axkuk
k'ayib'aal
k'ayinel
k'ayinel
k'ayiil
k'aytesiil
k'a'uxl
k'a'uxlal
k'a'uxlanb'ilal
k'a'uxlil
k'aak'aleb'aal
k'aak'alenel
k'aak'alom
k'aak'anel
k'aal
k'aalil
k'aam
k'aamal
k'aamk'ot
k'aan
k'ehal
k'el
k'erex
k'iche'
K'iche'
k'iche'b'aal
k'iham
k'ila
k'ilab'atz'unk
k'ilayehiil
k'ila'u
k'ileb'aal
k'ilolb'
k'im
k'imalch'iich'
k'inich
k'isis
k'isk'im
k'isk'is
k'ix
k'ixix
k'ixkoot
k'ixk'ib'
k'ixleb'
k'ixsetleb'
k'ix'atz'um
k'ob'b'il
k'ob'leb'
k'ob'olal
k'ochkaq'l
k'ochleb'aal
k'oj
k'ojarib'
k'ojarib'aal
k'ojlajik
k'ol
k'onoljuch'
k'onon
k'onop
k'ontz'uq
k'orechib'aal
k'orechtul
k'orkik'xe'
k'orleb'
k'osleb'
k'ot
k'otleb'aal
k'ox
k'oy
k'oyim
k'oyoneleb'
k'o'al
k'ook'
k'oopopo'
k'u
k'ub'
k'ub'el
k'uch
k'uhilpek
k'uk'umtz'iib'
k'ulb'ab'aq
k'ulb'atz'iib'
k'ulb'ayaab'
k'ulb'ilal
k'ulb'lem
k'uleb'aal
k'ulim
k'ultiq
k'ulub'
k'ulub'em
k'ulul
k'ulunel
k'ulunik
k'ul'esilal
k'um
k'utaamil
k'utb'ahom
k'utb'aatal
k'utb'esib'aal
k'utb'esil
k'utcha'alk'anjel
k'utleb'hu
k'utleb'ruuchich'och'
k'utub'
k'utunel
k'ux
k'uxch'iich'
k'uub'
k'uub'ahu
k'uub'anel
k'uub'ank
k'uub'ch'iich'
k'uub'ch'iich'kem
k'uub'kutha'
k'uub'lajik
k'uub'leb'aal
k'uub'leb'chaq'rab'
k'uub'suutaalkik'
k'uub'tz'iib'leb'
k'uub'wank
k'uuk'iil
k'uuk'um
k'uula'al
k'uulb'ahu
k'uulchob'
k'uuleb'aal
k'uuleb'aaltiq
k'uuleb'jalam'uuch
k'uulhu
k'uulmetz'ew
k'uut
la
lajetqil
lajtesib'aalxul
lak'am
lal
laliin
lampr
lamuunx
lanb'alwa
lanlanch'och'
lanlanil
lanleb'
laq'juch'
eetal
latzleb'ch'iich'
latzlut
latztz'in
laan
laas
laat
laatz'al
laaw
laawil
lechleb'
lechuuk
lek
lekleb'
lem
lemaal
lemaal'esil
lemaal'ix
lemskaaq
lemtz'b'on
lemtz'ch'iich'
lemtz'juch'leb'aal
lemtz'pek
lemtz't'ikr
lemul
leplepb'aal
lepon
punit
letzelhu
letzleb'
letzool
leech
leeleb'
liklik
limoox
liseens
lit'leb'aal
lit'ok
liib'r
liitr
liiwr
lochte'b'aal
lokoch
loktor
lol
loq'al
loq'alil
loq'b'ilch'och'
ilok
loq'leb'
loq'leb'aal
loq'om
loq'onel
loq'tasalhu
lo'y
lo'yil
loob'
loob'
loon
loor
loot
loot'
lub'ik
luhasib'aal
lukleb'
lukleb'aal
lukub'al
lukum
luqaak
lus
lut
luttz'uq
luttz'uqyaab'
luuns
mach
machb'onleb'
machteken
malka'an
mam
Mam
mams
maniiy
mank
mansaan
mansek'
mantariin
manteek
map
maqab'
maq'onel
mar
maril
maril
markariit
martiiy
masleb'
masleb'ha'
masleb'ix
matk'
matq'ab'
matz'
max
maxel
maxxul
may
mayab'
mayej
mayertz'iib'
mayonees
mayr
mayta'
maajel
maajelal
maajewank
maak
maakonel
maak'uy
maal
maalajkch'uut
maars
maarts
maaruuchich'och'
maasumal'ajl
maatan
maatanej
maay
maa'alixq
maa'alwinq
maa'anihilk
maa'us
mechtul
melon
memil
mem'riiy
mes
mesb'eel
mesche'
mesleb'
mesunel
metz'ew
metz'ewil
metz'kelob'
Meej
meet
meetilsu
meex
mierkools
milaakr
minb'ilna'leb'
misik'
mitz'jalam'u
mitz'jisb'ilis
mitz'k'amk'ot
mitz'k'icha'al
mixpirik
mi'
miin
miix
mochiil
moch'
moch'kar
mokooch
molam
molb'
molool
Mopan
moqoj
moqonil'uxk
moqx
moqx
mormon
moronk
motor
motzo'
moyileb'
mo'
mooch'
moor
moos
moosil
moot
muchkej
much'
muhej
muhel
muhelil
muhilb'atijok
muhilsik'leb'
muhiltaql
muhil'esil
mukuy
mul
muliin
muluq'ut
muluq'utchahim
muqa'al
